Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,286
Muffler or noise-suppressing system; prevention of fumes and smoke; requirements.

Every vehicle shall be equipped, maintained, and operated so as to prevent excessive or unusual noise. No person shall drive a motor vehicle on a highway unless such motor vehicle is equipped with a muffler or other effective noise-suppressing system in good working order and in constant operation. It shall be unlawful to use a muffler cutout, bypass, or similar device on any motor vehicle upon a highway.

The engine and power mechanism of every motor vehicle shall be so equipped and adjusted as to prevent the escape of excessive fumes or smoke.

Laws 1931, c. 110, § 42, p. 318;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-1173;

R.S.1943, § 39-777;

Laws 1967, c. 232, § 1, p. 617;

R.R.S.1943, § 39-777;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,137;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 382;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 31.